Hawaii statutes.
§249-14.6 Violations; penalty. Any
seller who violates the provisions of section 249-14.2 or 249-14.5 may be fined
not exceeding $500. [L 1974, c 105, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 188, §3]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next